Utah statutes.
54-17-607.   Procedure and appeals under this chapter.
(1)  The governing authority, as defined in Section 54-15-102, has primary
jurisdiction concerning issues of interpretation, implementation, and
administration of this chapter.
(2)  An appeal of a commission order under this chapter is governed by Chapter
7, Hearings, Practice, and Procedure.
